Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-706.15
Department; enforcement powers; Attorney General or county attorney; powers and duties.

(1) In order to insure compliance with the Bovine Tuberculosis Act, the department may apply for a temporary restraining order, a temporary or permanent injunction, or a mandatory injunction against any person violating or threatening to violate the act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act. The district court of the county where the violation is occurring or is about to occur shall have jurisdiction to grant such relief upon good cause shown. Relief may be granted notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law and shall be granted without bond.

(2) It shall be the duty of the Attorney General or the county attorney of the county in which violations of the act are occurring or are about to occur, when notified of such violations or threatened violations by the department, to cause appropriate proceedings under subsection (1) of this section to be instituted and pursued in the district court without delay. It shall also be the duty of the Attorney General or county attorney of the county in which violation of the act occurred to prosecute violations without delay.

(3) This section does not require the department to report all acts for prosecution if in the opinion of the Director of Agriculture the public interest will best be served through other administrative, criminal, or civil actions.

Laws 2007, LB110, § 15.